apertium-cos.cos.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>aàbcdeèfghiìïjlmnoòpqrstuùüvzAÀBCDEÈFGHIÌÏJLMNOÒPQRSTUÙÜVZÉéWwKkXxYyÁáëūīḥʿțöāîĭēåăíóúÚōÓÍłßęåÅâêûîôç</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Sustantiu"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Nom propi"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverbi"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"   c="Preadverbi"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposició"/>
    <sdef n="ij"       c=""/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjectiu"/>
    <sdef n="rel"      c="Relatiu"/>
    <sdef n="predet"   c="Predeterminant"/>
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determinant"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Verb modal"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="Verb 'ser'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Verb 'haver'"/>

    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinit"/>
    <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstratiu"/>
    <sdef n="ord"      c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="def"      c="Definit"/>
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogatiu"/>
    <sdef n="pro"      c="Proclític"/>
    <sdef n="enc"      c="Enclític"/>
    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexiu"/>
    <sdef n="tn"       c="Tònic"/>
    <sdef n="an"       c="Animat/inanimat"/>
    <sdef n="pos"       c="Possessivo"/>
    <sdef n="nn"       c="Inanimate"/>

    
    

    <sdef n="acr"      c="Acrònim"/>

    <sdef n="ant"      c="Antròponim"/>
    <sdef n="cog"	   c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="top"	   c="Toponimo"/>
    <sdef n="al"	   c="Toponimo"/>



    
    <sdef n="inf"      c="Infinitiu"/>
    <sdef n="ger"      c="Gerundi"/>
    <sdef n="pp"       c="Participiu"/>
    <sdef n="pri"      c="Present d'indicatiu"/>
    <sdef n="pii"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="pis"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="prs"      c="Present de subjunctiu"/>
    <sdef n="cni"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="ifi"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="imp"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="fti"      c=""/>

    <sdef n="sci"      c="Nom científic"/>
    <sdef n="barb"     c="Barbarisme"/>
    <sdef n="percent"  c="Percent"/>

    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculí"/>
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminí"/>
    <sdef n="nt"       c="Neutre"/>
    <sdef n="mf"       c="Masculí / feminí"/>
 
    <sdef n="p1"       c="Primera persona"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Segona persona"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Tercera persona"/>

    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"       c="Singular / plural"/>
  
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="quot"    c="Quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs> 

    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>([.\?;:!]|[\?!]+|...)</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><re>[’'‘]</re><p><l/><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>"</re><p><l/><r><s n="quot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>»</re><p><l/><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>«</re><p><l/><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e><p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="latin">
      <e><re>[a-z]+ceae</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="sci"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[a-z]+acea</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="sci"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[a-z]+ium</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="sci"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="barbarisme">
      <e><re>[اأإآبتثجحخدذرزسشصضطظعغفقكلمنهويىءؤئةە]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[а-яё]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[άαβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρσςτυφχψω]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="barb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)* °C</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l>%</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l><b/>%</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>imu</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>imi</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>2</re><p><l>ndu</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>2</re><p><l>nda</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>2</re><p><l>ndi</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9][0-9]+</re><p><l>esimu</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9][0-9]+</re><p><l>esima</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9][0-9]+</re><p><l>esimi</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="u/o">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="iè__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="è__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l>è</l><r>è<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>è<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l><r>è<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sì__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chì__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="/di__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>di</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d'</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>di</l><r>di<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>degli</l><r>di<s n="pr"/><j/>u<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="à__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="durant/i__pr">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <e lm="è"><i></i><par n="è__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ma" r="LR"><p><l>mà</l><r>ma</r></p><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ancu"><i>ancu</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mentri"><i>mentri</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="puru"><i>puru</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="piuttostu"><i>piuttostu</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ò"><i>ò</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mentre"><i>mentre</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="puri"><i>puri</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nè"><i>nè</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="eppo"><i>eppo</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="eppuri"><i>eppuri</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="parò"><i>parò</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="però"><i>però</i><par n="o__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sicondu"><i>sicondu</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sì"><i>sì</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sì" r="LR"><p><l>s'è</l><r>sì</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="chì"><i>chì</i><par n="chì__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="chì" r="LR"><p><l>chè</l><r>chì</r></p><par n="chì__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="chì" r="LR"><p><l>ca</l><r>chì</r></p><par n="chì__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="chì" r="LR"><p><l>ch'è</l><r>chì</r></p><par n="chì__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="parchì"><i>parchì</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="parchì" r="LR"><p><l>parchè</l><r>parchì</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="parchì" r="LR"><p><l>perchè</l><r>parchì</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="parchì" r="LR"><p><l>perchì</l><r>parchì</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="dunqua"><i>dunqua</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="dunqua" r="LR"><p><l>dunque</l><r>dunqua</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="dipoi"><i>dipoi</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="nonustante"><i>nonustante</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="nonustante" r="LR"><p><l>nonustanti</l><r>nonustante</r></p><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="quantunqua"><i>quantunqua</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="infatti"><i>infatti</i><par n="sì__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i></i><par n="/di__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in faccia di"><i>in<b/>faccia<b/></i><par n="/di__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="allocch'è à" r="LR"><p><l>allocchè<b/>à</l><r>allocch'è<b/>à</r></p><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="indu" r="LR"><p><l>indè</l><r>indu</r></p><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="per" r="LR" c="sub"><p><l>par</l><r>per</r></p><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="à dossu"><i>à<b/>dossu</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="contru"><i>contru</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="duranti"><i>durant</i><par n="durant/i__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="senza"><i>senza</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="daretu"><i>daretu</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="versu"><i>versu</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fora"><i>fora</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="innù"><i>innù</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="durente"><i>durente</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sin'à"><i>sin'à</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="à parta"><i>à<b/>parta</i><par n="à__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="urganizazione"><par n="u/o"/><i>rganizazion</i><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urganizazione"><par n="u/o"/><p><l>rganisazion</l><r>rganizazion</r></p><par n="relazion/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ufficiale"><par n="u/o"/><i>fficial</i><par n="naziunal/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ufficiale" r="LR"><par n="u/o"/><p><l>ffizial</l><r>ufficial</r></p><par n="naziunal/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ufficialmente"><par n="u/o"/><i>fficialment</i><par n="facilment/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="urganizà"><par n="u/o"/><i>rganiz</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urganizà" r="LR"><par n="u/o"/><p><l>rganizz</l><r>rganiz</r></p><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ubligà"><par n="u/o"/><i>blig</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iè"><i>iè</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eh"><i>eh</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="beh"><i>beh</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ah"><i>ah</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eccu"><i>eccu</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="allora"><i>allora</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nò"><i>nò</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bon"><i>bon</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aiò"><i>aiò</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hein"><i>hein</i><par n="iè__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="latin"/></e>
    <e><par n="barbarisme"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="ordinals"/></e>
